firefox-mte/intl/locales/sv/hyphenation/hyph_sv.dic
4töp
tö4pi
3törer
tö1re
törs3t
tö2rs
tö4vas
tö1v
5té
u1a
u2b2
ub5al
u3ba
ubb4le
u4b2b2
ubb3l
ub3lic2
ub1li
u4bo
u3cha
uc2
uc1h
u5cl
u2d
u4dak
u3da
u5d2e
u2d3r2
ud4ret
ud1re
ud1s4a
u4ds
u4du
u4d2y
u1e
u2es
uf4fä
uf2
u2f2f2
uf4tan
u2ft
uf3ta
uf4to
4u1ga
u1ge
ug2g3s
u2gg
u2g1n4
ug4ns5
u2g3s4
u5i1e
u1in
u3is
u3itet
ui1t
ui3t2e
u3j
u2k4e1b2
u1k2e
u5ki
u4kl2
uk5la
u2k3n
u1k2o
ukos4
u2k2s
uks5k2o
uks2k4
uk3tris
u4k1t
uk2t2r4
uk2tri
uk2t5s
uk4tä
u3ku
uk3v4
u1la
ul4di
u2l2d
uld2s2m
ul4ds
ul4du
ul4dö
ull3s4t2e
ul2l1s
ull2s2t
ull3än
u1lo
uls5ti
u2l1s
ul2s2t
ul2t2r4
u4l1t
u3lu
u1lä
u1lö
um4fä
u2m1f2
um4so
u4ms
ums4t
u1mu
u3mör
5unde2r1l
u2n1d
un5d2e
un5der
1under1sö
unde2rs
1unde2r1v
un4dom
un3do
un2d3r2
un4då
un5g2e1f2
u2ng1
un3gersk
unge2rs
ung5i1t
un2g2i
ung3r4
ungs4p2
un2g2s
3unif2
u1n2i
unk3l2
u2nk
un2k3n
un4k2r4
un1s2k
u4ns
un4t2r4
u2n1t
un5tra1ti
un2t1ra
untra1t
u5nu
u1o
u1pe
u4pe2r1n
u1pi
u2p2l
u3plet
up1le
u1p3lik
up1li
3upp3fa
u2pp
up2p1f2
1up4p3g
up4pin
up1pi
1upp3la
upp2l
5upp3lä
up4p3r2
up2p3s
upp5s2p2
up5ut
u1pu
u2r5ak
u1ra
ur5a2r1v
u3rar
u3re
u1ri
u1ro
u4ro3b2
u4rom
urs5tin
u2rs
urs2t
urs1ti
ur4stä
u5r2y
u2sak
u1sa
u2s5a2n1l
u3scha
us2c2
usc1h
u3se
usen3
u2s1k
us3k2a
us4kla
u4skl2
us4k2r4
u5s2k2y
u1s4kå
us5lä
u2sl2
u2s3n4
u2s2p2
u2s3pen
u1spe
us5ta1t2
us2t
us1ta
us3ti1g
us1ti
u3stik
us5tin
ust5ro
ust2r4
u4stå
u4stä
us3v2
u4så
u4sä
u2sö
u4tak
u1ta
1u2t1b4
u4te1f2
u3t2e
ute3s
utik2
u1ti
u5t2il
uti3ö
ut3j
3u4tjäm
utlan4ds3
u2t3l
utla2n1d
u1to
u3t2op
uto5s
ut3r4
ut4rer
ut1re
ut4ro
ut5rop
1utru
2utsi2d
u2ts
ut1si
ut3sl2
3utslä
2u2tt
utt4j
u2t1v
3ut5v4ec2
u4t1ve
u5t2y
ut3ö1v
u5u
2u1v
u2vak
u4vj
u4vä
u5å
u3ö
va5dro
va1d
va2d2r2
1va2g1n
2v1ak1ti
va4k1t
va2l3k
val4li
val4s2t
va2l1s
5va2lv
5va1ma
4vand.
va2n1d
4va2n1p
van4s2t
va4ns
van5t2r4
va2n1t
5vap
2v1a2r1b2
va4res
va1re
va4ri.
va1ri
4va2rk
va2r2s
vart5r4
va2r1t
v4a1ru
vas5ti
vas2t
5vat2t5n4
va1t
va2tt
4v2au
4vav
5v2a1v4i
2v1b4
2v1c2
2v3d4
1ve
5v4ec2
ve2k
ve3k2e
4ve2l2d
vensk3ä
ve4ns
vens2k
5vente1ra
ve2n1t
ven3t2e
v2e3n2y
ve5nö
4v2ep
ve2r5g
3ve2rk
ves4
ve2s5p2
ve1s2t
3ve1ta
3ve3t2e
vet5sa
ve2t2s
vet2t5s
ve2tt
2v1f2
2v1g
2v1h
v4i
vi4c2
vi4d3s
vi2d
vil4d3s
vi2l2d
vi4l4t
3vind.
vi2n1d
vin2g3s4
vi2ng1
3vinkl2
vi2nk
vi2no
5vin2st.
vi4ns
vins2t
5vins3t2e
vi5n2y
3vis.
vi5sa
vi2s5h
vis5k2o
vi2sk
vi4s2t
vis3ta
vi2t2r4
vi1t
vi4var
vi1va
4vj2o
2v3k2
2v1l
2v1m
vmö2rk4
2v1n4
1vo
4vok.
vo1k
2vom
4vo2r2d
2vo2r1g
vos4
2v1p
2v2r
5v2rak
v1ra
3vre1ra
v1re
v3ru
2vs
v4s2c2
v1s2k
v2skri
vsk2r4
vs4mi
v2sm
v3s1n2i
v2s2n4
v2so
v1s2t
vs4t2e
vs5trå
vst2r4
v5styc2
v1st2y
vs3vå
vs2v2
v2sö
2v1t
vu4d1
v1u2n1d
4v5up
4vut
2v1v
3v2y
5vå2l2d
vån2g2s3
vå2ng1
3vå2r2d
4vå1ri
vå3ru
3väg
väg2g5s
vä2gg
vä4l
väl2l4s3
3vä2n1l
3vär3d2e
vä2r2d
vä4ril
vä1ri
4vä4rj
5vä2rk
3vär2l2d2
vä2r1l
2v2ät
3väx1
4vög
4vöp
3vör
1wa
we2
w2h
wh2i2
w2i2e
w4na
x1
xa2n5d4
xem3pla
xe1m
xe2m1p
xem2p2l
xis4
xk2
x1li4
xs4
x1ti2
x4tå
2y
y1a
y4bris
y1b2
y4b4s
y2d
y4da
y5dan
y4do
y2d3r2
y4ds4
y4du
y4dö
y1e
y1ga
y1ge
ygg3r4
y2gg
yg4g2å
ygs4p2
y2g2s
y1i
y1ki
y5klis2t
ykl2
yk2lis
yk1li
yk5lon
y2k3n
y1k2o
y1la
yl4gj
y2l1g
y3li
y2l5k
yl5lä
y1lo
yl4t2r4
y4l1t
ym2fl
y2m1f2
ym4for
ym1fo
y3må
yng3r4
y2ng1
ynk5l2
y2nk
yn4sa
y4ns
yns4t
y3or
y5ou
y1pe
y5po
yp3ri
yp2r2
yre4s
y1re
y1ri
yr4ku
y2rk
yrk5v4
y1ro
yrs4k
y2rs
yr5s2t
yr5tu
y2r1t
y1rå3
y5scho
ys2c2
ysc1h
ys2s2t
y4s1s
ys3ta
ys2t
ys3ti
ys4tik.
ys2t3ra
yst2r4
y2tak
y1ta
y4te.
y3t2e
y4te1a
y1to
ytt3r4
y2tt
y2t5v
y3va
y3v4i
y3vä
y5w
y5å
1za
1ze
ze4ro
1zi
1zo
zo4nal
zo1na
4zp
z5s
3zu
z4zin
z1zi
å1a
å3dj
å1d
åd2s4l2
å4ds
å1e
å1f2
å1ga
å1ge
åge2l
å2g3l
åg3s4k
å2g2s
åg3s2t
å1g2å4
å3i
å1ki
5å1klag
åkl2
åk4strä
å2ks
åk1s4t
åkst2r4
å1la
1ål5der
å2l2d
ål3d2e
å2lin
å1li
å2l3k
åll4s2p2
ål2l1s
ål2s5e
å2l1s
ål3s2t
å1lä
å1m
åma4n4s
å1ma
ån2d4r2
å2n1d
ån4du
åns4t
å4ns
åns4v2
å3o
å1p
å2p2l
å5pla
å4pö
år4do
å2r2d
ård4ra
år2d2r2
år4d2s
ård4s3t
å4rel
å1re
å1ri
å5ror
5år2s1av
å2rs
år1sa
år5s2li
år2sl2
år2s2v2
år5ö
ås4k2e
å2s3n4
å4s1s4
ås4sk2r4
åss2k
ås4t
å3t2e2
å2t3ri
åt2r4
å3trå
åt2s2j
å2ts
åt2t5s
å2tt
å1v
ä1a
ä2b2
2äc2
äck5v4
ä4ck
ä2d
äd4d3s
ä2d1d
äd4du
äde4s
ä3d2e
ä2d3r2
äd5se
ä4ds
äd3s2t
ä3e
ä1ga
ä1ge
äg4g2o
ä2gg
ä2g1l
äg3r4
äg4re
äg3se
ä2g2s
ä3i
ä5j2o
4äk
ä1ki
ä2k3n
äk3r4
ä1la
äl4pap
äl1pa
äl4se2g
ä2l1s
äl1se
äl1s5ko1g
äl2sk
älsk2o
äl4s2lu
äl2sl2
äl2t3r4
ä4l1t
äl2tu4
äl4vin
ä2lv
äl1v4i
äm2p3l
ä2m1p
4ändli2g1h
ä2n1d
än4d5l
änd1li
änd3li1g
än2d3r2
änd1s2t
än4ds
äng5r4
ä2ng1
änni3s4
ä2n1n
än1n2i
än4n3s
ä4no
än2s1l2
ä4ns
än4s2t
äns5t2e
än4s2v2
än2t3r4
ä2n1t
ä3pe
äpp3l
ä2pp
ä4p2r2
äp4s4t
ä2ps
ä4rap
ä1ra
är2b1re
ä2r1b2
är2g5l
ä2r1g
är4g2r4
ä1ri
ä4ri1b4
är4kä
ä2rk
är4nis
ä2r1n
är1n2i
ärn3s4t
är4ns
är2nå
är4nö
är5o3b2
ä5rol
ä3rop
ä5ror
ä5ros
är2si
ä2rs
är4sk2o
är2so
är4s2p2
är2s2v2
är4ta2n1d
ä2r1t
ärt4an
är1ta
är2t2r4
är2t3s
4äs
äs3pa
äs2p2
äs5pi
äs4s2k
ä4s1s
äs4s2p2
äs3ta
äs2t
äst3r4
ä4stä
ä4så
2ät
ä3to
ä5t1re
ät2r4
ät4s3k
ä2ts
ät5t2e
ä2tt
ät4t2op
ät1to
ätt3r4
ät4tu
ät4t1v
ä1va
ä2vak
ä3v4i
ä5vu
ö1a
ö2d
ö4dak
ö3da
ö4dal
ö4da2r1v
öde4s5
ö3d2e
ö4dis
ö3di
öd3ra
ö2d2r2
ö4d2s
öd3se
ö4du
ö4dö
ö1e
ö1ga
ög5ak
ö5gar
1ö2g1d
ö1ge
ö5ger
ö2gg4
ö2g1l
ö2g2n
ög1n3e
1ö1g2o
ög3si
ö2g2s
ög3sk
ö1i
ö3j2o
öj4s2v2
ö2j1s
ö4ka2r1m
ö1k2a
ö1ki
ö2k3n
ö2k2s
ök3sl2
ö1la
öl4kv4
ö2l1k
öl4kö
öl2p
ö5lä
öman4
ö1ma
öm2kl2
ö2m1k
ö4nal
ö1na
ö2nom
ö1no
öns3k2e
ö4ns
öns2k
ön4so
önst3r4
öns2t
ö3pe
ö4pel
ö3pi
öp5li
öp2l
ö5plo
1öp4p1n
ö2pp
ö4p2r2
ö3r4an5d2e
ö1ra
öra2n1d
ö3r4as
ö4rask
ö2r1b4
ör3d4r2
ö2r2d
ö2r1e1n2i
ö1re
ö3res
ö4res4t2r4
öres2t
ö3ret
ö2r5evi1g
öre1v
örev4i
ö2r3g
ö1ri
ö5ri1g
ö3ri2ng1
ö2r3i2n1t
ör5ir
ör5iv
ör4kal
ö2rk
ör1k2a
ör1k2l2
ör5k1li
ör4nis
ö2r1n
ör1n2i
ör3ol
ör1or
ör2p5la
ö2r1p
örp2l
ör1s2k
ö2rs
ör3sl2
ör4slä
ör5t2e
ö2r1t
ör2t5s
ör1u
ör3v2r
ö2r1v
ör3y
ör1ä
örö4d
ö2sak
ö1sa
ö2s3n4
ös4s2j
ö4s1s
ös2s2k
ös4s2p2
ös3ta
ös2t
ö4s2t3v
ö2tak
ö1ta
öts5k2o
ö2ts
öts2k
öt4s2t
ö1v
ö1ve4
över1
5öve1re
ö2vj
öv3ra
ö2v2r
öv3ri
öv4s2k
ö2vs
é3e
